Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4118.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 411.806 to
411.845.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “electronic theft” means gaining unauthorized
access to data stored on a recipient’s electronic benefits transfer card by means of card
skimming, card cloning, phishing or other fraudulent methods.
(2) If a recipient’s supplemental nutrition assistance benefits are stolen through elec-
tronic theft, the Department of Human Services shall provide replacement benefits to the
recipient.
(3) The department shall adopt by rule a process by which a recipient may submit a claim
for replacement benefits under this section.
SECTION 3. ORS 412.006 is amended to read:
412.006. (1) The Department of Human Services shall administer the temporary assistance for
needy families program, consistent with the requirements in 45 C.F.R. part 260, to provide to families
with children:
(a) Aid;
(b) Case management services that focus on the strengths of the parents or caretaker relatives;
(c) Resources and referrals for education and training or education or training services;
(d) Work and work preparation services; and
(e) Resources, referrals or services to improve the family’s economic stability, including but not
limited to:
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 292

HB 4118
(A) Mental health and addiction treatment;
(B) Housing; and
(C) Child care.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(3) At least once every two years, the department shall report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human services, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245:
(a) The percentage of individuals residing in this state who are eligible for but do not
utilize the temporary assistance for needy families program; and
(b) The outreach strategies used by the department to encourage enrollment in the
temporary assistance for needy families program.
SECTION 4. ORS 413.500 is amended to read:
413.500. (1) The Women, Infants and Children Program is established in the Oregon Health Au-
thority. The purpose of the program is to serve as an adjunct to health care by providing nutritious
food, nutrition education and counseling, health screening and referral services to pregnant and
breast-feeding women and to infants and children in certain high-risk categories.
(2) The authority shall adopt:
(a) Standards and procedures to guide administration of the program by the state in conformity
with federal requirements and to define the rights, responsibilities and legal procedures of program
vendors; and
(b) Rules necessary to implement and carry out the provisions of this section.
(3) At least once every two years, the authority shall report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human services, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245:
(a) The percentage of individuals residing in this state who are eligible for but do not
utilize the Women, Infants and Children Program; and
(b) The outreach strategies used by the authority to encourage enrollment in the
Women, Infants and Children Program.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the authority may assess a civil
penalty against any person for violation of any rule of the authority relating to the Women, Infants
and Children Program. The authority shall adopt by rule criteria for the amount of civil penalties
to be assessed under this section.
(b) All penalties recovered under this section shall be deposited into the Oregon Health Au-
thority Fund and credited to an account designated by the authority. Moneys deposited are appro-
priated continuously to the authority and shall be used only for the administration and enforcement
of this section.
SECTION 5. (1) The Hunger Task Force established in ORS 458.532 shall study food
wasted by grocery stores, farms and schools in this state. The task force shall submit a re-
port in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to agriculture no later
than September 15, 2027. The report shall include:
(a) The volume of food wasted by grocery stores, farms and schools, expressed as per-
centages of the total amount of food sold, grown or served;
(b) Proposed standards for reducing food waste;
(c) Proposed incentives for reducing food waste; and
[2]

HB 4118
(d) An evaluation of the potential for disproportionate impacts of food waste standards
or incentives on grocery stores, farms or schools of varying sizes.
(2) The contents of the report required under this section may be included within the
annual report required under ORS 458.545 (8).
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 7. (1) As used in this section, “food desert” means an area with limited access
to affordable and nutritious food.
(2) The Hunger Task Force established in ORS 458.532 shall study food deserts and pro-
grams that provide food in this state. The task force shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services no later than September
15, 2027. The report shall include findings about:
(a) Current food deserts in this state; and
(b) Existing programs that provide food to persons living in this state to address the
impacts of food deserts, including programs that involve residential gardens and community
gardens.
(3) The contents of the report required under this section may be included within the
annual report required under ORS 458.545 (8).
SECTION 8. Section 7 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 9. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[3]